District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.41

Establishment of AccessRx Pharmaceutical Resource Center.

The Department shall conduct a program to provide life saving prescription and nonprescription medications and medical supplies by enrolling eligible individuals into pharmaceutical assistance programs. Of the funds appropriated for the Department of Health for fiscal year 2006, the Director shall enter into a contract with the Archdiocesan Health Care Network, Catholic Charities in an amount up to $1.956 million to operate and administer the program and provide sufficient personnel to ensure appropriate oversight of the program.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 141
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5072, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5062(b), 53 DCR 6899
D.C. Law 16-192 substituted “in an amount up to $1.956 million” for “in the amount of $1.956 million”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5072 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5062(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5062(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5062(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
Short title of subtitle H of title V of Law 16-33: Section 5071 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle H of title V of the act may be cited as the AccessRx Amendment Act of 2005.